Nokia X@@@...continued from previous review. Details of all important apps required- 1st app-- search for "contacts transfer" app in “1mobile” so that you can get all your contacts from old phone in seconds very easily. 2nd app-- search for "whats app" from "1mobile store" & downloaded the first search it shows & you can get "Whats app" too. Tips:- enable the “unknown sources” option under settings security first before download the “whats app”. 3rd app-- "Newspapers IN" from "1mobile store" & get this app to read news around world of almost more than 75 different newspapers. & in single click you can read the news as per your choice. 4th app-- "VLC player" from "Nokia store" so that you can play any format. 5th app-- "Tube mate" from "1mobile store" to view & download the "youtube" videos, in one click you can search the video & in next click after selecting you can download the video, it will ask for the quality of video need to be download, but i have seen the screen clarity of nokia x is so good that you didnt need to download the heavy HD files just select "640x360(WEBM)". After selecting the format of video click on "green down arrow" and the software will start downloading the file & you can view the status of download just a swipe from left to right & here you can see all the you tube downloads also. The same status can also be seen in fastlane. I have downloaded "baby doll ragini mms" song at same "640x360(WEBM) only at 14MB, and the clarity of video & sound is really impressive. 6th app-- "File hide expert" from "1mobile store". this app can hide or can be said will protect your files(audio/video) from those whom you didn’t want to show. 7th app-- "songs" from "1mobile". This app will help you to download mp3 songs. Tips for “songs app”:- just click a song only once as it will not display or give message that the download has been started, just go to fastlane & there you can see the songs is downloading. If you will click multiple times the same file will start download multiple times which will slow you download speed & again will fill your mobile with duplicate files. Along with this i have downloaded bookmyshow, flipkart,amazon apps & they all are running absolutely fine. And above all the very first thing you have to purchase a 16gb or 32gb micro sd class 10(for faster speed) memory card so that from starting you can download all the files, apps & even install apps in memory card which will keep the phone internal memory free & ultimately help for smooth operation of apps & interface. c)- Games -- 1star I doesn't like to play too much games but all the pre installed games are useless & demo versions so plz uninstall except "Danger dash", this game i have played & it works very smoothly, also you can download popular games through nokia store & 1mobile store. d)- Her maps -- 5star This is one of the best pre installed app, you can view the maps when you are in middle of road without any wifi/3g/2g or any network but for this first you have to download the country/city map as required & its a big file so i will recommend to download from good speed wifi & you should have memory card & get it download there, if you will not follow this i am sure you will hang your mobile & then start abusing Nokia. e)- Mix Radio -- 3star This is an online as well as offline player where you can listen tracks online if you have good internet speed & download them if you out of reach, but i didn’t find good as per my taste. d)-Music -- 4start This is just a pre installed player but i will recommend you to use VLC player as it has many functions & user friendly. e)- FM radio -- 4star Its same as a normal Fm player but one most important thing missing is you cant record, but for this you can see many fm recording software available at Nokia store as well as 1mobile store. f)- camera -- 3star Good cam for daylight & outdoors not good for indoor or night shoot. g)- Opera/Internet browser -- 3star Both are good & have quit good speed but i am disappointed that i didn't find the "bookmarks" option in both of these browsers, i will download some other browser so that the website which i regularly use need not to be typed every time. 6)- Earphones – 2star Not good sound, check with other earphone i am using samsung & they are working too good. 7)- Wifi/Bluetooth connectivity – 5star Yes both are good. Along with this there are many small pros & cons which are acceptable. I hope you can find this review useful to purchase the rock star, and further if you have any query regarding settings or apps in Nokia X you can ask at flipkart same by mentioning my name so that I can know you are asking me. I will try to solve your issue ASAP.
After lot of comparison of specs, reviews & internet surfing between Nokia Lumia 520, Asha 503 & Nokia X i purchased Nokia X. & after heavy usage in last 2 days i came to know that all the people who have given this product 1 star have never used the product only did study through net & made thought. It really dosent matter you are using android, forged android or windows or any other OS the this matter is your purpose should fulfill, and for and average age 25~35age person (i mean matured) i feel that this a really a rock phone. An full android phone can run thousands of apps but merely 10-15 apps are necessary which you can get here also. Here are the details -------------------------- After lot of day & night usage in last two days i came to this conclusion:- 1) UI - 4star -- Tiles & fastlane is great combination, all the things happening gets added in fastlane, you didn't need to dig into each application every time. 2) Display & touch - 4star -- Most of the people have reviewed that this mobile has very low pixel & samsung, micromax have bla bla.. but after usage i must say that its really very good, you will never feel down in this category. One thing I find Nokia missed is that the single back key should have little led display, I mean in night if you are using the phone several times you will click somewhere else as its a touch responsive key & you can’t see where to touch. 3)- Battery - 3star -- The battery last for almost 6-7 hours of full usage in wifi & 3g & if you use both 3g & wifi almost 3hours a days then it willl get down by night only. But the mobile gets heated(back lower cover only) if you use wifi/3g at the time of charging, but i must say that even a 25K android phone also gets heated more than this, so dont worry about it, try to use after full charge & buy a flip cover which will isolate heat. 4)- Body build -- 5start -- the design is very sleek & goes into pocket very easily. Body is polycarbonate which gives you some good feeling while handle, one major worried point is the glass is not "Gorrilla" so take care with again a flip cover. 5)- Applications pre installed -- 4start – Lest go in detail off all the pre installed apps: a)- Email – 5star All the people who are saying that gmail cant be used they are kids, just go to email app(pre installed) & configure the gmail account. Remember that it will ask to enable IMAP which is always required if you want to use your email in outlook,thinderbird, iphone... Tips: -- For Gmail: just go to your gmail account from your laptop & under settings/Forwarding and POP/IMAP go to "IMAP Access" category & select "Enable IMAP". & save the changes. Now open the email app in Nokia X & insert the user ID & password of gmail account. Thats ALL & you can get the gmail account here, similarly you can configure any account & multiple accounts too. As i am using hotmail & gmail. I get every email update in fastlane too so I not need to open email account again & again. Tips:- disable the "Always download attachments" it will ask in settings of account in nokia x, otherwise it will keep on downloading all the attachments which you eve don’t want to see & will fill you phone with unnecessary files. b)- Nokia Store -- 3star Nice & have at least all the required apps you need. Tips:- first when you get the phone in your hand get "1mobile" store app from Nokia store as many required apps can be downloaded from here. Details of all important apps required- ......continued
Great Delivery Time I received Product within 2 Days .. All is good in Nokia X .. Not an android phone as people are aware of.. Nokia with Help of Try to do something and they bought NOKIA X to you.. All what you get in android is in Windroid .. battery back good as nokia is .. i tried on Wifi 2 days and still on ... Speakers are great .. Goods to carry .. good touch ... Sim is micro slot it should remain
Display clarity and touch sensitivity are good. Sturdy build quality from Nokia. Width and length of phone look little unmatched...Phone looks like a box. Except the design no other drawbacks. Battery life is good for a 4" phone. User interface takes one or two days to get used to, it is great afterwards. Camera is much better than it's fixed focus counterparts. Overall very good phone for Rs.7,500/-...
finally our long search for free recharge ends here recharge of 300rs free on registering through below link.. registering is so easy and just spend less then a minute to get 300rs u can thank me later go into the below Link To Register. COPY THE BELOW LINK AND PASTE IN ADDRESS BAR AND CLICK ENTER THEN JUST FILL DETAILS TO GET REGISTER... http://u.laaptu.com/login1.action?rid=cojQM1raU2xmHBbxTKnTqYli3l0ylZXQ9VoLNz0uwSE=
Maximum android apps and games working in Nokia X. Whats app, Gmail,Hotmail, Yahoo Mail, Facebook, We chat, Skype, Twitter, BBM, Facebook Messenger ... etc, No Google Play store, but replaced One mobile Market,Nokia store...etc.,There is a lot of android games, apps.
Nokia has fooled its android customers. It is selling windows facility phone under the banner of android platform. Apart from the android platform and user interface, nothing s android. The app store of Nokia is worthless, doesn't even have what's app.Such a shame for such a big company whose app store is such a pitty. I tried downloading two different versions of gmail from external market with no success. This product is a complete dump and I would advice consumers to stay away from buying it until and unless Nokia provides a 100% android phone.
Nokia seems to be using Android to clear its unsold inventories from Win Phone. Clear indication from the low 512mb ram used in the X model. Even the name of the phone shows that it is an ex- model of phone, outdated in specifications. Surely, investing in this phone would mean you don't intend to use it for too long. I am shocked to see why people are even bothering to have a look at this outdated piece of hardware. Seems more like they fallen into the trick that Nokia will produce Android's some day. No dear, this is an inventory clearance trick. Here to lure you so that they can clear their trash and focus on newer hardware.
product is good from the house of nokia best in this range(as compared to lumia)....supports maximum apps..pre-installed games are useless :P.... good daylight camera...product heats up on long use(games etc)... Whats app, Facebook, We chat, Skype, Twitter, BBM, Facebook Messenger all work..
A good budget phone! Almost 70 to 80% of android apps(available in playstore) are available through nokia store and other third party market like 1mobile market. Whatsapp, bbm, viber, fb and all leading apps work very fine! Mix radio with offline download facility needs a extra credit. It offers you music even offine. Battery comes for a day for normal usage. Fastlane is good but for an android user its going to be a different experience. For the price of 7k am completely satisfied with the product. apps are movable to memory card and it allows 32gb external memory card to be inserted.Speaker quality is good. Camera is normal and has no flash. But a complete budget phone. P.S. Data cable does not come in the package. The cable is fused with the charger head and cannot be used for data transfer!!!
Its best android phone from Nokia combined with microsoft. I used it for last 10 days and found that it gets heated even on normal internet use and even while on call also. I dont know is the problem to all devices of Nokia X or only to my phone. Keeping this problem aside , the phone is great in this low price.
bought 2 phones from flipkart . delivered before the promised date ! i am Nokia lumia user and this one has some essence of it. few things i doubted about Nokia X initially but that's not worry and those are 1. Android applications - (i found all application i wanted. whatsapp is not available in nokia store but by changing security feature i was able to download) 2. Multitasking (it has but somewhat different than regular androids) 3.built quality (feels like a solid unibody piece though it has removable back cover) 4.512 MB ram 1 GHz snap S4 (no lags so far :) !) overall it's a good buy !
1. Game khelte time phone heat karta hai, 2. baat karte time humari awaj baat karne wale ko clear sunai nhi deti.
Good build, Camera is poor for the cost, inbuilt games are in french which gives dismay...apert from this its a gud buy
Used it for 2 days and here is what i would say Good Things : build quality -- afterall its Nokia :) screen camera (though very less megapixel at the cost) 4. Memory exansion Problem : 1.They have released it as Android mobile but no Google play alternate option is Nokia store which is useless ..... u need to pay even for Angry bird :P 2.they have added some local stores which sounds similar to our local baniya shop where u cannot find anything great 3. Battery is too bad , cant be used for a day even with low usage 4. UI looks similar to windows but it doesnt actually gives feel of that at all 5. Processor and Ram combo is just average and even if u try hard it lags for apps.. i would say , dont waste your money on this rather go for LAVA IRIS 406Q which has the baap of all processor "Snapdrogon" with 1 gb ram and adreno 302 ...400MHZ GPU and price wise just nothing in comp[are to these brands
It was good. Able to use all the required facilities. Unable to download Whatsapp. Can anyone explain why? or whom I need to contact ? The cost which I purchased thro' Flipkart RS.8100/- withing 10 days it got reduced to Rs.7200/- in Flipkart. Why this rate variation?? Othethan this product is very good. Regards G. BHASKARAN
dis is my first phone ....... i am happy to hv it . its colour is awesome too. may be it does hv many apps bt it is excellent 4 the beginners ....
If some one is looking for pure android experience, please look for other option. But that doesn't make this phone poor by any means. This is targeted towards a different kind of customers who will be using smartphones for the first time (or light users) , still want to access the huge app market of Android. Nokia is the best brand for optimizing low spec phones. The build is also very sturdy. I really like the display and build quality. Nokia x interface is very easy to use and has Asha Series like feel , everything comes in the home page only. I didn't feel the phone lagging with the limited usage I had. Also the camera is quite good for a 3 MP shooter. And yes, you can download whatsapp and all other major apps from third party market like 1mobile etc if it is not available in default app market. So its a good buy if you are not looking for pure Android devices. Its more of an upgrade of the Asha phones with giving users access to the huge app market of Android.
I bought this mobile for my uncle. This phone ticks all his requirements and off course price. You get a solid build Nokia phone. For this price you get navigation software which no other manufacturer gives. Apart from this UI is really good and it is responsive. Overall, it fulfills my uncle's requirement. Thanks for Flipkart for providing this item for best price and delivered one day before the promised date. Kudos to your service.
chinese interface , very slow on first use , disappointed as soon as i switched it on right now,, will return most probably,, got it ten minutes before ., Just Same as 256 Mb Ram MicroMax Phones Am returning it right now,. my Lumia 520 is 1000 time better than this
this is the android for beginners, who is going for first android experience, good phone, touch command is ok, but one demerit is its nail touch and cloth touch activity, like when u put ur phone in pocket then by touching cloth it automatically wakes up and make call or sms to some one, if u didn't lock the phone by password, camera is 3.15 mp, but it z very clear n smooth, u feel like a 5mp camera, awesome, headphone quality is v poor, it better if u buy a skul candy or sennnheiser headset, display is overall good, when calling sound quality is good, listning music by phone is also good, i like its mix radio aplication, over all this phone is worth for money, what u can expect in 7k.
i have ordered Nokia X today lets see when i will receive & after usage will give the true review. After lot of comparison between Nokia lumia 520, Nokia Asha 503 & Nokia X i came to finalize Nokia X is best among all. Will update the comparison soon.
i yesterday got this phone and works without any problem i liked nokia x and delivery from flipkart was good.
Thanks to flippy for the service...............as compare to other online store i prefer to be with the flipkart as it is so genuine. i want to just open the eyes of the people who are thinking as nokia x is not good ...........i must say bull shitt yaar its a splendid product just go for that. 1) camera quality is awesome as it is 3MP butclarity as 5MP 2) processor works good 3) all apps are easily downloadable and runs good 4) screen clarity is also good 5) battery back up is also good as it is a multimedia device but good battery back up.
Nokia X takes you atleast 3 years back in terms of UI, Usability, hardware and overall experience. Basic minimum features like merging the contacts in contacts list, having single login account for various features require lots of research to do and mostly not possible. Not having Google Services is another pain, else most of the services like mail, calender, contacts would nicely sync without you would know. With Nokia X, you will have to struggle and research for every small such usability features. And this looks like a beta release of a product, as simple usablity like changing the color of default app tile is excluded. I wouldnt want to have pink tiles on my screen, but I dont have an option to change those colors. I wouldn't recommend this product. I felt like Ginny Pig for the experiment that Nokia is doing while trying to merge Windows+Android+Asha features. One Star for its Sound Quality, and Nokia's RadioMix App. Its really good.
I feel flipkart loose his old face. Delivery delayed for three days. The nokia x the new avatar of nokia family. Dual sim work perfectly. All apk application what i want are worked fine. I like it. But in build games are trial games. We can use apk application via memory card. Other android interface are same. Only change is desktop interface. The nokia here maps is super and we can use in offline without internet. Ram (512MB) is a little problem. But it is not a big problem whose use the mobile for the purpose of business. Screen clarity little bit worst. We can view indian languages like tamil, telugu...ect. Hence no problem to view mails which came to our mother languages. But nokia must do some improvement to fight with original android mobiles. Camera ...............????.
I have Purchase nokiax model dated on 4th april 2014 from flip kart.This mobile is not good i have disappointed to use this phone. Nokia x problem describe below- 1) When you open 3 apps at a time then mobile is not work i.e hanging problem 2) battery back up is only 2.5 hour when you use in 2G Network. 3) processing time is very slow
I bought this for my mom who was earlier using a Candy Bar Keypad Phone. I was keenly tracking Nokia's launches for a Lumia (Windows) Dual SIM & to everyone's surprise, Nokia came up with this one @ MWC - 2014. It made me give it a serious thought since this was Nokia's first venture into Dual SIM phones with it's Smart Phone category (newer gen). I opted for In-a-Day delivery & Flipkart kept it's promise. So another great experience with Flipkart. There's nothing extra-ordinary about this apart from Nokia's first step into the Android World. My mom does not have a Data Plan on her SIM which is why I haven't been able to check-out the App-Store. I'll add in those details soon. Things that I didn't like: 1> Screen is not very touch sensitive/responsive (Lumia 520 is miles ahead of it) 2> Screen resolution too isn't very impressive (Lumia 520 is miles ahead of it) 3> Removing the battery is a little difficult (could be subjective) 4> Heavy & non-curvy design 5> Did not let me transfer contacts & messages from old Noka X2 although both belong to Nokia family I had bought a Nokia Lumia 520 for my wife last year & that made me restore my decreasing faith in Nokia & so I had high expectations from Nokia X too. However, points 1 & 2 made me feel I should've chosen Lumia 520 for my mom too.
PROS: very solid build, absorbs shock efficiently clear call quality, can be very loud call reception is good even in remote area wifi reception is good. many of the default software can be uninstalled variety of software from Amazon store, 1 market and Nokia store CONS: Sometimes hangs, sometimes doesn't register touch (not that bad but sometimes) not intuitive UI (I switched to Aspier iOS7 launcher) camera is average but useful battery backup is average
go with nokia first android smartphone . low features good pricing and high qwality mobile.camera flash is missing but camera qwality is food . it is not a fully android but based on android. finally it is a excellent budget smartphone
Hardware - The Nokia X is a total fail in terms of hardware. Packing a 2 generation older Adreno 203 and dual core snapdragon s4 play it's a total crap. The Adreno 203 was featured in phones that were cheaper or of similar cost in its days. With Snapdragon games having no longer optimization of games , oh BTW there's only 512MB RAM , so don't think this is going to be a genuine multitasking Android smartphone. Now on the Moto G , you get a Adreno 305 and a quad core Snapdragon 400 quad core processor + 1GB RAM. I am using it and I can guarantee a perfect experience in all ways and things , be it gaming or general usage. Display - The Moto G has a beautiful 720*1280 giving a best in class 331 PPI and thus making it capable of HD content. Whereas the Nokia X has a standard crappy 480*800 display which is what you'll find in a 3.5K phone too. Plus the Moto G hits the sweet spot of 4.5 inch which is just perfect for gaming and texting too. Did I mention it has Corning Gorilla Glass 3? Camera -The Nokia X hasclass...imary 3.15 camera with no secondary can. The Moto G whereas has a 5MP camera with 1.3MP camera. What else can I say. Feel - The Moto G has a rubber back which gives it a feel better than those plasticky cases out there. OS - Google is the original Dev for Android and since Motorola is now a Google brand expect stock updates before anyone else and has guaranteed updates for 12 months from now. Cant say anything about Nokia X right now. There you have it , decide whether to buy a not so good phone or to spend some more and get the beat in class
First to mention.. ****Filpkart**** worst strategy about the delivery date, they mention one day ahead in the schedule and its very obvious that you will get the product exactly before the day mentioned in the expected delivery. Some people who are not aware of this, think that flipkart is delivering way ahead than the expected. but its not... its just to attract customers. The phone becomes very hot and you can feel the battery drain, while using internet and sharing internet(Tethering). The phone touch sensitivity is not that good, and speed is what you get for 512MB RAM, cannot expect more than that. If people are looking for a decent smartphone, you can for it.. it will be worth the money. Only drawback would be battery..
I received the phone on 28-03-13 and on 29-03-13 I had placed a request on the telphone to return the product as it had the following defects: 1. takes 5 hours to recharge 2. the phone gets hot while talking or charging. 3. Battery backup is not good 4. when there is call waiting the present call gets dropped. But a week has passed and I have heard nothing from flipkart and i Feel that I have been cheated. On your website you have clearly mentioned that you have a 10 days refund policy.
I had ordered White color nokia X , i was expecting white color headset for it but unfortunately nokia gives red color headset for while color..(Shit i don't know what make them think white suits red???) Moreover i did not found any info which could give me details about the headset color for particular handset color
I love flipkart best buy from here genuine products i love u flipkart its a very good product I had great time buying on flipkart
1st of all I would like to thank flipkart for the lightning fast delivery within a day & also pricing it @ a cheaper price! As already the specifications are mentioned, let me throw some light on my experience after I used this phone (THIS IS A FULL IN-DEPTH REVIEW FROM ME, READ ONLY IF U R INTERESTED TO KNOW IN DETAILS ABOUT THE PHONE):- >Sturdy built quality : The phone luks very cool, although its cheap its polycarbonate casing is hardy. Its slim & mat finish. >OS & hardware: capacitive touch is super,customized skin luks pretty gud I must say, its an amalgamation of ASHA+WINDOWS OS where u can go 2 fastlane, resize the tiles & mover around, but yes u can create a folder which u cannot in a Windows fon,multitask wid ease, colorful tiles luk pretty cool..So u can call it "WINDROID" OR "ASHADROID" which evr u want! GPU can run medium level of graphics, basic gaming shouldnt be a problem, its dual core Snapdragon but lags for a sec, I hope its not that big deal for the user! Auto Screen Rotation function doesnt work 4 texting! Lastly u can download skin launchers "Go launcher EX" for giving ur device the Android luk! >Battery backup : after the 1st charge its still longing more than a day! (you really need it) >Cam clarity : its 3mpx fixed focus, but user can change the sharpness of it from options giving it a descent pic clarity, color reproduction is medium. There is face detection, Anti Banding which avoids stripes on pictures you take of TV or computer screens. Sweep panorama is a downer, as the cam shutter speed is slow, sweep panorama images will appear blurred! Video recording can be done in 16:9 aspect ratio also, shooting in gud lighting conditions/ in outdoors, its fine wid 30fps but shooting under low lighting conditions/ when shooting indoors,fps falls drastically. Ok if ure not in2 too much of photography! >Access to Android apps : yes, this is the best part, almost 75% Android apps are supported, but again after I received an update for the OS(11.1.1) Whatsapp wasnt supported after it was downloaded installed from the official site, but it will work if u install an app which luks lyk 'play store' from NOKIA STORE called "1mobile market''. But other social apps like, fb, BBM, WeChat, Skype, is working no doubt. Not pretty sure whether NOKIA would release some update fixes. Also u wont get Chrome in it, instead there is 'NOKIA browser' which plays youtube videos smoothly. >Gaming : Well its 'ok' kind of, 'Ninja Fruit' has very low aspect ratio, making it more complicated to slice the fruits, 'Temple run-2', 'Candy Cursh' etc.can be downloaded from "1mobile market'' & it works fine . Yes the loading time takes about 5-6seconds more otherwise basic games works perfectly! >Display : ah cud've been a bit better lyk the 520, I knw its IPS screen but NOKIA cud've opted for a bit better display but its nice! Better than cheap handsets of china or other brands. >Sound : if u r a music lover, I say go 4 it, its damn loud, very loud inbuilt speakers and nice output from the headset, u get equalizer presets, 3D effect which is better than android fons. Just buy a memory card and load all ur favorite tracks and ure gud 2 go! output from the earpiece is loud enough for calls. >Other features : quite impressed with the ambient light sensor and the proximity sensor, it works well. u get Astrofile lyk android for managing ur files & data in ur fon! Data traffic is very low indeed, I connected 2my wifi and 37mb file got downloaded in a jiffy dats sumthng i was impressed coz its not prevalent in my old NOKIA fons and my latest android fon either! For the interface, toggling to the option menu is a little complicated as its minimized in d bottom middle of d screen otherwise its ok! Dual sim - u get 2 select from which sim u want to call/sms/use data pack. U get the wifi interface just lyk android, for modifying network/forget etc., even u get the wifi hotspot, GPS for navigation I mean that's a lot , WOW! Oh & I expected a 4GB memory card cause u'll get 1.2GB free for usage & USB cable inbox, dats sumthng NOKIA is providing for the ASHA series! I can say that its much better than all those low end SAMSUNG which gives disappointing touch responses, cheap plastic build material and very poor battery backup! If ure a heavy social networking freak, heavy text msging user, dont wanna spend too much and hav an all-rounder fon den grab it!! This is wat u want! NOKIA shud now leverage this segment wid betr UI,hardware upgrades to revive the Company!
Every person now a days knows that Nokia is now regarding as worst company in the world and very rapidly loosing its business portfolio. It has very few product to sell and thus it charges a high value to its phone as well as its accessories. Thus no one want to get a new phone from Nokia. I personally was in Finland(The country having the head quarter of this company), and there persons are just DISLIKE to buy a phone from it. Rather than they go for either Samsung or Motorola(Android phone). So why this company chiefly selling this product in India. But the products are bad and the Nokia Care service is also tremendously worst here in India. So, please go for Samsung, Motorola, Apple. Just avoid Nokia(if you don't want to be disappointed).
Flipkart delivery-i don't think anyone would question that (5/5) Looks-guys nokia x is just too sexy to resist and its very handy (5/5) OS-i was quite confused whether to go for it or not but now that i've used it i'll say u'll love it (4/5) Apps-although google store wont work but nokia store is there and third party app stores are there too,so no issues in using diff. apps (4/5) Camera-gives decent quality pics in daylight,i wish it had flash too but still its good (4/5) Battery-its nokia dude,sufficient battery life(with full charged battery i used it continuously for 2 days n still 15% was left) (5/5) Fastlane-u'll find it highly supportive after 2-3 days of use (4/5) Memory-internal memory 4gb but aprox half of it can be accessed,so u do need a memory card and 512ram seems to be fine at the moment with some basic apps running quite smoothly (4/5) for me,its a great buy,probably the best smartphone under 8k,go for it !!!
hi friends, i bought this phone before 1 week that's good and it is working properly ,but here Nokia have a one mistake secondary camera is not available otherwise this mobile is so good compare to samsung core which have price11****,
First of all let me tell you one thing when I saw this phone i couldnt believe it was android but yes it was..I wasnt thinking of taking it but some how i prchased it..but lol it can play all the .apk files without any lag.It is a fantastic Phone.I had only 15% battery but it worked for 2 hours with playing subay surfer for 30 mins.Some apps will not be available in the nikia store but no problem you have the 1 mobile store.But i started to have some difficulties after installing the system update which turned my phone to 11.1.1 software.While talking tom it said "there was a problem parsing the package" which means my phone is incompaitable with the app.So i recommend dont install the system update till your phone get 2-3 months ld.Four Star for incompaitable version.........
I purchase this phone for the size. it is easy to keep in pocket and ram camera is engh nd gd, batry backup upto 2 days for me. i lik this phne fr brnd, batry nd size
Awesome phone by NOKIA very royal and ultimate look.:-)feeling very nice after using dis product.Thanks to Flipkart for giving me this genuine product.delivery was also very fast.Nokia RockS....!!! NOKIA IS BACk..! ultimate battery back up.Nokia ka jawab nai dosto sachchi..Best product under this range with best Brand name. waiting for NOKIA XL (of more features).
The worst of all the smartphone I have ever handled...... Seeing the reviews on flipkart, even I got this piece of shit....now I am regretting... There goes a saying "Too many cooks spoil the soup"....which is exactly the case with this phone.....The developers might have tried to come up with some sort of a common platform for Android and Windows;instead they came up with a DISASTER .........Many of the apps you see on a third party store would not work at all...Even google calender won't synchronise. For a user like me, who relies on google calender for his daily routine, this is a poison... No doubt the performance may carry along considering the price range....still not at all suitable to be called an ANDROID phone.... Please consider other products rather than going for this one....you all would not gain anything in terms of the android wave unless you would consider rooting the device which would then void its warranty. Other than that,multitasking...my foot.....the multitasking UI doesnot exist. I can relate it to a situation where i have spend working on a project for hours and then there is no button to save it....horrible.
Nokia X runs on the outdated ARM Cortex-A5 processor with only 2 cores and Adreno 203 graphics with only 512MB RAM. Most Chinese phones run on Cortex-A7 processor and some now come with quad core A7 too. This is the lowest specs on a phone you can buy today. Not worth the price. Dont fall for the GHz number the old architecture is much slower as same frequency (GHz). Heck, the most popular chipset currently is the Mediatek MTK6582M which is a quad core A7@ 1.3Ghhz even Moto G which is supposed to be a budget phone runs on Snapdragon 400 which is a quad core A7 architecture with 1GB RAM. It's so simple: ask yourself how can a phone with a dual core 1.2Ghz cost Rs.5000 when some phones like MotoX with dual core processors at 1.7 Ghz cost 24,000? The answer is simple obviously the dual core processor on MotoX is a lot faster at similar fequency because it runs on ARM Cortex-A15 architecture (actually it is Krait 300 but for simplicity sake). What do cheap phone makers do if they can put the more expensive A15 processors on their phone? They add more cores! What does NOKIA do? They sell the same old architecture because they think they can fool you buy saying 1Ghz, lol. GHz means nothing look at computer processors they reached 4.4Ghz but now they are putting 2GHz processors why? Google soemthing call IPC (Instructions per clock/cycle). Now for some numbers: Cortex-A5 : 1.57 DMIPS/MHz per core Cortex-A7 : 1.90 DMIPS/MHz per core Cortex-A9 : 2.50 DMIPS/MHz per core Cortex-A15: 3.50 DMIPS/MHz per core (Krait cores can do a little better but lets stick to the "standard numbers" here given that we are not comparing Qualcomm to something else like Mediatek) Math time: Moto X : 3.5 * 2 cores * 1700 Mhz = 11900 MIPS Moto G : 2.5 * 4 cores * 1300 MHz = 9120 MIPS NokiaX : 1.57* 2 cores * 1000 MHz = 3140 MIPs
I am using this phone and not satisfied with the performance of this device Nokia: Brand you can trust Display: 4" two point touch which is so so after paying more than 8k Hardware: Nokia's hardware is pretty good Ram: 512mb ram can't afford all apps It goes very slow sometimes Battery: Battery is good because its not a Pure Android Phone Camera: 3mp primary camera and no flash similar to nokia 5233's 2mp, there is no front camera for video calling. Don't go in hurry think twice before buying or wait for the Nokia XL
I have not this phone. I have Nokia Lumia. But Nokia's X platform based phone compels me to write review. My brother has this new Nokia X. Before write anything about the phone I want to let you know this phone is not an android phone, this can run android application and games as Nokia X developer put the Kernel of android in this phone. This is X operating system based phone. Right now it can run only 70% android apps available in the market. Camera of this phone is awesome but having low RAM sometimes games lag. Other than that the phone is enough mature to hit the market of "Samsung Android". Though is phone is new player in android market I believe within a short period Nokia will be able to capture android market.
I bought this phone about a week and a half ago. Of course, I did quite a bit of research before buying it. After reading all the reviews on flipkart, I was very skeptical, but went against it and bought nokia x. I love it! Here are my two cents. How did you start getting used to an android phone when it was just introduced to the market? Sure, it was something new and you played around with it but at times it was a little annoying right? Same issue here. Nokia's OS is something new--it was just brought into the market about a month ago. Cut it some slack and don't look for minor drawbacks like "doesn't have google play", "fast lane is weird", etc. All in all, it's a great buy for the stated price with very very minor drawbacks. But if you're one looking to spend a good 8-10 hours at a stretch on your phone, go for it! It all depends on how adaptable you are :) PROS: 1. affordable price without second thoughts 2. fastlane is actually a neat way to clear out the RAM; just press the trashcan icon and memory gets flushed out. its similar to pressing the home screen on androids and way better than swiping off each unnecessary app. 3. the 512 RAM promised isn't so bad after all. its more than sufficient to have apps running throughout the day 4. battery life is great. i go for about 2-2.5 days with minimal usage (phone and texting) without charging it and 1-1.5 days when Wi-Fi is on 5. Expandable memory (upto 32GB) is a god given gift these days CONS: 1. this one bugged me the most. nokia expects everyone to have an Exchange account. without that, you can't add/delete events on your calendar. i'm a student and the calendar is my life but it annoys me that i can't use it to its full extent 2. speaker phone is at the back of the phone--the full volume is suppressed when the phone is placed on cloth (beds, pillows, pockets, purses) NEITHER PRO NOR CON: 1. Nokia store---sure it has good apps, but doesn't have whatsapp. That's not an issue. download it from 1mobile. Nokia store gives access to other stores' apps, so download those. They have more or less all the apps google play does 2. 3MP camera is just that---a 3MP camera. don't expect much of it although it has good editing options which make up for the grainy pictures it takes 3. scrolling through the tiles/apps -->personal preference but i prefer scrolling up and down my apps rather than fish through 4-5 pages of apps sideways Why did I give it a 4 star? CON #1....Hope this helps!
awesome smartphone... only the best can give the best result... now waiting for nokia xl.. which is going to rule the market.
I have bought it recently.. And its really gud budget smartphone. Its look quite solid and rugged with really nice display n processor. Those looking fr first smartphone its nice choice.
Though it is a android Based Phone but this phone has extra features of a smart phone. In Some Phones this features ar not available, you have to pay a high cost. It runs with Snapdragon S4 Processor. Still the Phone is Under 8k. I prefer this as the best phone under 9k.
If you are looking to get a phone between 5K-10K then go for this phone without giving any second thought, The build quality is great, Flipkart delivered this product in 24 hours. Tried installing multiple android apps on the phone and they install well. Temple run, temple run2, temple run oz, subway surfers all work great. There was not even any lag even though the RAM is just 512MB, the memory management is great. So far the phone works up to the expectations, its a great buy for the college going guyz! The speaker is amazing so is the battery, last 24 hours with moderate usage. A good buy at this price!
When I received the product I was surprisingly amazed, I was using smartphone from 2005 and nearly a decade goes to experience different types of OS with different brands. Now a days Samsung is the market leader in smart phone segment but there are hardly any differences being Samsung or Sony or HTC all same android with almost same interface. But after receiving Nokia X I am surprised by it's- 1. Built Quality - It's best in class 2. Simple Design 3. Simple yet Xciting User Interface - any type of user can use this very easily 4. Lots of apps - The Android advantage 5. Image Quality - Best in class Image quality (3mp-5mp category)/don't expect good image at low light 6. Crystal clear sound quality on external speaker or with a headphone\ 7. Battery back up very good, runs whole day with average apps activity 8. Decent Hardware - OS/Apps/720p video doesn't freeze, Would have been better if comes with little bit more RAM 9. Overall worth buying it under 8K budget with the trust of Nokia.
3 OS combined Not pure android Forked version of android Really tedious to get some activities of Android Microsoft has submitted to Google by using there OS There are no Google services on this X. Better go for a pure android MOTO G
I Bought this phone from Nokia store. I can't believe that Nokia have come back again in market with this beast. this phone come more then your expectation . amazing gaming experience. Big screen. HD resolution. 4 GB Internal memory. Nice Look. new interface. very fast. and the main thing it comes under 10000/- must go for it for new experience.
Flipkart wants customers to pay 1500 extra for other colors, what the hell! The only downside of this phone is GPU (Adreno 203), heavy frame drops will occur in course of playing games like temple run and subway surfer. Talking about camera both lumia 520 and Nokia X lacks flash, both perform well in daylight and have low light issues. No competition in case of camera. Those who are planning to buy Nokia X+ should know that 768MB Ram (but same camera and screen) is not going to make a big difference in performance. All 3 have same processor as of galaxy core (S4 play) which proves that Samsung is overcharging. For those who said that installing play store can be done by simply an apk, It is not like that! You need GOOGLE SERVICES in order to run play store which in turn needs phone to be rooted, and ROOTING VOIDS WARRANTY. In short play store installation is not a good option. You can always Side load other apps though! The interface is still more responsive than touch wiz. Overall, it is a steal at this price in terms of quality.
Nokia Quality is Maintained at the Top as expected. I am using Android since 2 years, I have used Sony Xperia TIPO, HTC Explorer, Zen honestly Nokia X is way better than all of them. A very good phone. Nokia X is having a very new design to use android. If you are bored with old android and want some change go for it. those who are planning to buy this one and still confused between several android phone and this one these point can help them: 1) Hardware quality is commendable. 2) Camera is 3.2 MP but equivalent to any 5 MP cam of Samsung. 3) Dual sim, Well works fine. 4) Internet surfing is superb 5) Almost all android Apps are working Fine. 6) Display is very good even in sunshine. 7) I didn't find any situation when my phone was slow or hanged. * please remember the amount you're spending, please don't compare it with IPhone 5S or Xperia Z2. Only drawback is that without flash so low quality photos in night. Except that Nokia X is completely worth for the money. Music is awesome in speakers as well as in ear phones. ? ? ? ? Nokia Rocks ? ? ? ? ???????????????? GO FOR IT ???????????????
Excellent Product at this Price and the excellent delivery by Flipkart. Really happy after buying this product.
I have purchased this model recently. It feels wonderful to handle this unit. Nokia has really come long way to acquire the market. Kudos!! Some Important points -->Best in class(Price will drop soon~7200) -->Best display(LCD) -->Decent Hardware specs. -->Nokia trust(Service center available in remote locations as well) -->Decent applications available. --->Sturdy+Made for Indian market. --->1500 mah battery + 4 inch display is nice combination. Guys do compare this set with some available market options like LG|Samsung etc.You will find this set winning in all aspect. I would like to name it as "Budget Smartphone".Go Grab it.
it's a good phone i ever seen in this range,it's quite handy for use,colors r attractive.But has some lacuna,at 1st it is not working like android,no play store,3mp cam is not good,should give flash.some games r not working well. battery is getting hot within few mins,some videos r not support .sound quality is not good.
Nokia, a symbol of trust from last 10 years has presented a phone that is believed to revive the name of the brand. But I am sure, this was an unsuccessful attempt. I will continue with my review point wise… What goes right? 1. Build Quality and design Nokia X is built with polycarbonate body. It’s very sturdy and hard. Colors are bright and everything here is perfect. Design is good and fits easily in hand. This phone fell from my hands twice, but no sign of any damage. 2. Weight Nokia X is a bit heavy. But its ok. 3. Software Software is Nokia X Platform, which is Nokia’s own customized android. Nokia has removed all the google services (play store, youtube, gmail) and provided Microsoft services. Just a shift of companies. All in all, the software is smart and controllable. Microsoft is way more reliable than Google. Check out "scroogled" on internet for more details. 4. Sound – Excellent. Too clear. Loudspeaker is really loud and pleasing. Earphones throw out soothing sound and very pleasing! 5. Wifi – Great connectivity. Catches weak signal with confidence!! 6. Battery – Sturdy battery as expected. Lasts way more than any Samsung phone. Even more than Lumia. 7. Here Maps – Offline Maps are of great use. 8. Touch – Smooth touch experience. Nice touch screen 9. Video - Plays HD videos smoothly and pixels gives brilliant colors. 10. WhatsApp - Works great with X. Its fluid and fast. 11. Processing: Dual Core processor works best for processing related tasks Cons: 1. Slow Response: The phone takes time to respond. Basic tasks like calling and sms too are not snappy. 2. Mix Radio: You can listen songs only online. You can skip only 6 songs in an hour and can only download 4 songs for offline listening with 30 days validity 3. Multitasking: Fastlane is not an alternative to the multi-tasking. Depending upon the amount of free RAM, the minimized apps gets running. Else they will automatically get closed. 4. RAM: Not enough for high end games. I installed Angry Birds Go but it automatically exits. This phone is not for the RAM demanding applications. Don't blindly believe any reviewer. Check the history of reviewer and then take the decision. Thank You in advance ;)
i will not say much about technical specs of the phone as we all know about the specs For Sleek UI Low cost Against Low storage Chunky design Verdict The Nokia X is a hard phone to work out – on the one hand, it's a super cheap handset and as such has the budget specs you'd expect. On the other, it seems to be not much better than the Lumia 520, which is a Windows Phone handset and supposed to sit above it in the product line – on current prices, it's also cheaper. There are some worries here even for the developing nations: that 4GB of storage could get eaten up quickly, and while Nokia is touting the ability to add third party apps through other stores, new phones can live and die by app availability and that could kill the Nokia Android project. The Nokia X is constructed well enough, has a interesting new UI and is breaking new ground – but as a new phone, it seems a bit expensive for what's on offer.
Own services for low spec hardware is what nokia is now. Don't know the future after Microsoft acquires!! Not worth the money
Worst phone i ever had. 1. Phone is very thick and heavy. 2. The touch screen is very slow and takes at least 2 seconds to process every task including call disconnection and unlocking the screen. 3. The speaker is loud so others near you can hear your conversation as well. 4. Gets heated up very much when watching video. 5. The package doesn`t contain a data cable. 6. Phone comes with a ugly dark red colour headset. 7. Poor camera.
to those self proclaimed nerds who are claiming nerds about android and nokia fan boys, it is a total overpriced device. has shit of a processor laggy and shitty gpu. what you think nokia you customize it like your windows shit and ppl ll accept you? nokia is outdated and lost its place in the market! a battery back up wont save your shame that android is a proof that you lost it, yeah! mobile is now simply not your thing. pros- battery, design cons- UI, Processor, Performance, GPU, Camera, Sound, Usability, Notification. PS. some morons mocking 'crapsung' or other crap companies etc! relax morons, your time is past. this crapsung and other crap companies acquired more market than nokia ever ll or ever done, they provides technology, comfort at a cheaper price! you glory hunter fan boys ll never understand that! n to understand better performance you dont need m.tech in microprocessor, all you need a rational and sensible BRAIN, which you really lacking! n seriously how many chinese company do you know? HTC, Samsung, LG, Apple, O2, Motorola, Google all are chinese eh?
HELLO SOME STUPID PEOPLE LIKE AMIT WH USE AND WANT EVERY THING IN LOW PRICE IN 8 K THEY NEED 8 MP FRONT CAM AND REAR THEY NEED 16 MP , OCTOCORE PROCESSER . THAT TYPE OF HAVE NO KNOWLEDGE THEY JUST RELY ON CHEAP BRAND AND ROAMING AROUND SERVICE CENTRE FINALLY ONE THEY INJURED DUE TO BLAST OF THEIR DEVICE . SECOND COME TO GOOGLE SERVICE FIRS GOOGLE MAP NEED EVERY TIME INTERNET AND WIFI , IN INDIA WE CANT OPEN ALL TIME INTERNET ITS CONSUME AT THAT TIME HERE MAP WHICH CAPABILTY OF WORK OFFLINE WHICH FREE NAVIGATION FOR LIFE TIME , SECOND GOOGLE DRIVE NOT FULL SUPPORTED AND WE CANT EDIT SINGLE DOC AND SPREADSHEET ITS TOTALY LAGGING EXPERIANCE , 3 RD IS GMAIL CONTAIN FULL OF ADVERTISING ,AND LAST HANGOUT EVERY ONE HOW IS POOR CALL AND VIDEO QUALITY, THAT TYPE MAINLY BELIVE IN CHEAP BRAND BECOZ THEY DONT GO FOR QUALITY AND THEY GO FOR QANTITY .. SAMSUNG , SONY , AND ALL LOCAL VENDER USED CHEAP PROCESSER FROM CHINESE MAKER MEDIATEK PROCESSER AND THEY FOOL PEOPLE SAYING QAUDCORE FIRST GO AND SEARCH . AND LAST ALL APP IN NOKIA STORE FOR NOKIA X IS PASSED BY FOUR TYPE OF SECURITY AND EACH AND SINGLE APP OPTIMISED FOR NOKIA X PHONE SO U DONT FEEL INSECURE AND LAG LIKE IN OTHER PHONE BECAUSE THEY ONLY USED GOOGLE PLAY AND THEY DONT OPTIMISED FOR THEIR PHONE REASON IS THEY DONT CARE ABOUT BUYER THEY ONLY WANT TO MAKE MONEY . .
simply super first android phone from nokia..................................................................................
For anyone with 10 minutes of spare time, this phone is worth buying just because it does in fact run Android version 4.1.2. Head over to xda for a step by step guide to installing gapps on this and you have a fully functioning phone with the google now launcher. I have tested this and can vouch for it personally. With regards to performance, yes it is a little choppy but not insufferable. Call quality is top notch of course and the microsd slot is definitely a bonus. Been using it this way for a week. Probably the best android phone you can buy under 8k.
Well, I have purchased this phone from market as I wanted go gift to My dad on same day. I got this phone at 8200 vs 7800 from flip kart, Pricing wise OK. I wanted to gift a basic smartphone to my dad. I preferred this phone as My dad is rough user and till now only Nokia phone survives from him. I have used this phone for only one day and found too good. with only 512 MB RAM phone performed so well. temple run 2, Subway surfer wer running so smooth without any LAG. Its the device Memory management which make it performer. Thanks for nokia Why I choose this Phone ? 1) Nokia Brand 2) Liked the new user interfase, especially Nokia Fastlane 3) with the given configuration, the phone is really snappy 4) Looks are too rugged. 5) Phone seems too solid and durable 6) Camera is also ok (Remember higher megapixels does not enhances the picture quality, its the image processing) 7) Battery backup is great 8) with one hand, one can operate the phone 9) Typing is so accurate and touch is also good. 10) Nokia store is there for lots & Lots of apps 11) Nokia X comes in various colors 12) GLANCE SCREEN, its the USP of NOKIA 13) Notification center is present Yes, I am a nokia fanboy, but that does not means i will give a biased review. The review is based on the price given for the phone. Some cons may be 1) New user interface, for 1 day u feel quite confused but believe me the UI is so simple and within couple of days u will be used to it. 2) Many people don't like Metro user inter-phase. any ways I like Metro UI 3)Play store is absent, but nokia store is there with lots & Lots of apps 4) Looks of the phone is typical Nokia type with no round edges (I liked this design)
Now here is my review which is unbiased. Nokia X is not an android, rather its platform is android. Its hybrid platform. User Interface of Windows Phone and Asha. But the special feature is u can install every android apps u want. Since it does not have google play, u need to download it from torrent or in nokia store. This phone is for those phone lovers who want the best in hardware and are bored of same old samsungs.. With every Lumia phone apps and nokia apps u can enjoy nokia's unique apps which are par than Samsungs and Sony's.. With 512 RAM people might think it will slow down a bit, but it doesn't. Multi tasking is quite good since m using it for past 2days. With Nokia's Rectangular gorgeous look its hard to identify whether its Lumia or X. Disappointed with the camera, since 3mp is lot less in nowadays market, where Samsung is giving 5mp camera's with led flash. But since its an entry level Hybrid Platform phone, its quite good. Looks- Sexy (4/5) UI- -3.5/5 Performance- (4/5) Camera(3/5) Internet- (4/5) Battery- (3.5/5). RAM- 4/5 Based from personal use.
SINKING NOKIA IS TRYING TO REMAIN ALIVE STEALING CREAM FROM OPEN SOURCE ANDROID OS, BLOCKING PLAY STORE, BY REPLACING ALL FEATURES FROM NET GIANT GOOGLE BY SOME CRAPS OF MICROSOFT. I personally use Chrome (Not I.E.), GMAIL (not hotmail), Google Maps (not here/there map), Google Search Engine (not Bing), Google Drive (not Sky Drive), So why I should choose it? > It supports 80% of Android Apps: Oh My God, 80%!!! (If you use an Android, you don't have to think of %) > I don't like Metro Interface (So using Win7, uninstalling Win8 in Laptop) Give me a reason why should it be chosen? Only because it's from Nokia? I recommend to buy a 2k phone from Nokia but above that choose the present leader Samsung. As I'm not gonna buy a Chromebook or Android LAPTOP right now, similarly in mobile why microsoft? Use the most use Android. You'll get any new app first for this platform. Remember, OS is 'Nokia X Software Platform v1' not 'ANDROID'.
160 user reviews here and only 2 certified buyer reviews!! Looks like the entire NOKIA X manufacturing unit employee base was told to post their reviews here!! haha! :P What a sad thing. Nokia was a king in the mobile market. Their deal with microsoft and the pathetic failure of Windows phone 8, has made them reach towards such tactics. I really feel bad for them!
Price point may not be all that friendly for the hardware you get but definitely Nokia assures quality! Definitely worth investing rather than going for low end Samsung or MMX. Two things to note, firstly, processor is pretty weak for the type of applications today although justifiable for the price but the mainstream Adreno 203 GPU is very very weak! Since it offers dual sims, the 1500mah juice may not suffice for most people and would have to carry a spare battery or a charger... Anyday the quality of Nokia is far superior, no doubt! Its a slight bummer to see only 512 mb of RAM. It will suffice only day-to-day activities and not big multitasking! This will sprout new possibilities and may even find a sailfish OS port! I would proudly give it 3.5!
nokia provide 4 type of security compare google mostly google work for money and they dont care other brand like samsung , sony , other chinese oem they only care about nexus . thats why nokia remove all unsafe and useless service like google search , google map known for wrong direction , hangout out poor video quality this all app only good with wifi other u get cheap experience .most of asha phone perform better youtube and internet compare android phone under 10 k . build is very excellent futureproof plus u get update nokia mix radio , heremap known for real navigation and microsoft service they charges but they dont stole ur personal information like google .
When google provides a phone with official play store, and the user isn't using non-market sources or apk files the phone/gadget is safe to use. GOOGLE CHECKS ALL THE APPS ON PLAY STORE FOR SECURITY AND PRIVACY OF DATA. NOKIA X is based on a linux OS : android jellybean os source code is edited to make the OS for NOKIA X SERIES named "nokia x software version 1.0". Hence technically its not an android phone. It is equipped with NOKIA STORE and not GOOGLE PLAY STORE. Secondly developers would always prefer Google , because NOKIA keeps the policies difficult to follow . PLAY STORE KEEPS THINGS EASIER without sacrificing the quality and security of apps. When it comes to hardware, SAMSUNG did amazing job on the quality: Digital zoom of NOKIA is not as good as that of SAMSUNG phones, at lower price range for sure. The WORLDWIDE Success of SAMSUNG lies in the efforts it made in manufacturing and R&D. MICROMAX company has provided phones at low cost but their quality, after-sale services are not worth comparing with that SAMSUNG or NOKIA. Neither Nokia nor MICROMAX provide original firmware images of OS in their phones. SAMSUNG,HTC, GOOGLE(for nexus devices) do you can flash your bricked device with original firmware: getting it back to the original state. So there is no point in comparing SAMSUNG with MICROMAX. And to compare it with NOKIA U should not be biased with keeping discussion limited to hardware. comparing only the 2MP camera of SAMSUNG STAR PRO which shoots videos at 320x240 resolution at 15fps with 2MP camera of nokia 5230, which shoots videos at 640x480 resolution at 30fps is not justified because features that SAMSUNG star pro offers are not offered by NOKIA 5230 .e.g., adobe player, play store, wifi hotspot, capacitive touch, AFFORDABILITY etc are absent in case of NOKIA 5230 PLEASE DON'T MISLEAD CONSUMERS WITH YOUR OWN STORIES. I CANT POST THE HTTPS BUT Wikipedia, NDTV gadget guru are the sources you can use to know ABOUT GOOGLE's SERVICES AND THEIR COMPARISON WITH THOSE OF NOKIA & MICROSOFT. NOKIA WILL NEVER bring its best to NOKIA X series ,i.e., PUREVIEW & PUREMOTION HD technologies will be provided in lumia series only thats what their CEO : STEPHEN ELOP said. BEFORE BEING IN NOKIA HE WAS THE HEAD OF BUSINESS DIVISION OF MICROSOFT. Its him, who reduced the product range that NOKIA used to offer before 2010. ( probably from 50-70 to 20 ) HE announced that NOKIA would stop working on linux MEEGO based nokia N9 which was greatly successfull in 2011. It makes clear that HE WAS DETERMINED TO BRING NOKIA UNDER MICROSOFT He kicked Symbian 60, anna, belle, meego and all the rest out of NOKIA. and thus the VARIANTS are now limited to Symbian 40(asha), NOKIA X , LUMIA . 3 stars for 70,000 apps of ANDROID & NOKIA's decision of using Linux . WISH U good luck NOKIA LOVERS
Bought the nokia x two days back and I am impressed with the build quality & other functionalities.Being an active blackberry user for the past 11 years, it was really difficult to move away from BB devices. I have been following nokia x for some time now, ever since the rumors popped up on the interweb upto its recent launch.My main criteria was dual sim, BBM, email & couple of instant messengers (FB, Whatsapp) hence I decided to give this device a try. Few Observations: 1)Decent hardware 2)Fastlane + AOSP -its a new OS experience. 3)Simple interface, & easy to navigate 4)Battery life-it does last me 14 hours (emails/calls /instant messaging-BBM & whatsapp, occasional browsing & Nokia mix radio usage-during travel) 5)Build quality is impressive 6)Dual Sim -Sim 1 supports 3 G & Sim 2 Supports 2G 7)Call quality is good but could have been better 8)Network latching is good(no drops or call disconnects while travelling) 9) You need to have thirdparty app stores (1mobile market, mobango etc) to install whatsapp. Yes they do have an impressive collection of apps , though my application usage is far too limited, so It is not a big deal for me 10)Camera -3 mp (no flash) is real good for daylight shots, and the app for editing pictures is similar to the creative studio in Lumia Phones.Indoor/low light snaps aren't of good quality. 11)Nokia Maps-one of the best map interfaces. 12)Device heats up while playing games (but not to a large extent).This is not a high end gaming device & I guess that is ok 13)At times the phone interface is buggy, Touch interface, and response could have been improved. There is a slight lag when it comes to opening a menu icon and launching the respective application it is associated with. Not sure if it is only with the device I own, but just my 2 cents. 14) The phone is a little heavy and the edges of the fone might be a little uncomfortable while holding the fone for messaging or during voice calls. Was using a BB 9360 earlier so probably I might have to get used to this design. 15) Price could have been lower-probably between 7-7.5K INR (just my perspective). 16)Speaker phone sound quality is ok ,but could have been more louder 17)Headphone output is less and music playback quality is ok-ok when plugged to external audio output devices (pods, home audio, or speakers), Yet to set various equalizer options and check if the music output volume could be made better. I literally had to set the volume to max while using an Audio Technica (ATH SJ55) Headset plugged in. 18)Nokia Mix Radio-found the interface not as good as the ones in Lumia phones (which is Nokia Music).The search options are missing, and you can download offline mixes (max up to 3 at a time).Unlike Nokia music, where there is an option to sign in for subscription, I don't see the same in this interface.The MIX RADIO is a random set of songs across playlists and genres, and you have an option of moving to the next track within a mix only 6 times in an hour. 19)Email configuration is easy and simple, just need to enter the user name and password and the mailboxes are configured on the device.The interface is pretty good and smooth. 20)Integration with Outlook is fairly simple and email setup using the outlook app provided by the store is pretty good. 21)Display resolution is good.At ~233 ppi, it is the same spec as that of Lumia 520. 22)Overall a decent phone for the price. thanks
till now it seemed to be in shackles, but now with this device i feel that nokia had delivered a utility which will keep most of us satisfied. No bound on what application u use. Use what u want for the best smart phone experience. Amazing device in the budgetary range.
I bought it from local market I believe nokia but it Sucks No Person loves this Phone My one month salary(9000) totaly wasted Pros : 512 RAM and 1GHZ Processor does more than that No more Pros Cons: Irritating Camera (1000Rs china mobile may be better than this) Android phone without Google play (1market helps but its very slow) Touch response not equal to a company mobile (its equal to Lava phones) Fastlane (Fuckkklane) Only 20% android games and apps are compatible (80% installing dont open) Nokia Store = waste store 4GB internal is not real one Dont believe nokia Pls windup it -Seenivasan G Seenivasan@live.in
the only similarity with android are thee apps its a mix of windows and asha as well. So thats why 512mb is good enough. its not too thin but it dosent feel heavy. i know its a little stupid but if they had more fingers multitoch it would be a little better specially android apps. yes adreno is a little old but not too much problem with the proccesor for the price. and a cool feature you can install apps on the sd card. so no problem with memory.overall a nice phone but if you like great perfomance go for x+ when releases
I have a Lumia 620 and have used Galaxy Grand. My friend just bought the Nokia X a few days back and I had a chance to play with the phone for some time. There a few things which I really did not like. And here they go: 1. In Android, you simply press the Home button and it shows you the running apps. You can then just swipe away the apps you want to close. In Nokia X (and Lumia phones), you have to press the Back button to close EACH app while you are using it….and this is sometimes very irritating. Let’s say you are using the web browser. Pressing the Back button lands you into the previous page. So you have to keep pressing the Back button repeatedly to close the web browser! I wonder why Nokia came up with this difficult-to-use way of closing apps. 2. Nokia has changed Nokia Music to Nokia Mix Radio. While Nokia Music was pretty good, Nokia Mix Radio is awful. In Nokia Music, you could search for any song or album and download it for listening to it offline. You could keep the songs on your phone as long as you wanted. In Nokia Mix Radio, you CANNOT search for or choose any song or album. You can only choose the artist and then download the songs that are listed. Or you can download readymade mixes. You also CANNOT keep the downloaded mixes for more than 30 days. After 30 days, you have to download them all again. Nokia probably expects that everyone in India has access to free, high-speed internet….so they can easily re-download songs. Yeah right. 3. The 3 MP camera on the Nokia X is far below expectations. No HD video recording and the snaps are quite average. There is no LED flash either. Lumia 520 and Xperia E1 can record HD videos. Even an S Duos 2 has an LED light for the camera. 4. Nokia X is based on Android JellyBean. JB is not optimized for phones with low RAM, and this phone only has 512 MB RAM. Even a Lumia 520 or S Duos 2 is smoother than Nokia X. One thing that I liked in Nokia X was offline maps. Nokia HERE works very well on this phone. Once you download your state’s map, you do not need a data connection to locate yourself. The navigation is just as good as it is on my Lumia 620. I strongly suggest that you WAIT for KitKat phones. LG and Asus will be launching inexpensive KitKat phones in the next 2 months, and KitKat is optimized for low RAM. If you really, really need an Android phone immediately, go for Xperia E1. Better still, Moto G. I’m just waiting for Moto G to hit retail stores so I can exchange my Lumia 620 with it. My friend is already regretting the purchase of Nokia X. Hope this helps you make a purchase decision. If you have used an Android phone, you will probably NOT like Nokia X....because Nokia X is more like Windows Phone than Android.
this fone although lowly specced dosen't lag at all which is quite surprising and plays 720p movies without stuttering.
Lumia 520 costs around the same range and has much better specifications. If you want an android phone then you'll get much better than this at a lower price! Also it seems to have incorporated the user interface similar to that of the Asha range, which is a very boring range by itself :P
This is a good attempt but it could have been better priced at around 6-7k. Nokia does pack a good quality hardware but its bit bothersome that even Asha series is coming with 5 MP cam with flash but not supposed Android market breaker. Plus, 512 RAM is going to cause problems in long run. At 8k, this was very much achievable. Other than that phone is not bad so anyone wanting Nokia phone with Android experience can go for this. If Android is not really priority, Lumia 520 is still the best bet.
I Just bought this phone 3 days ago and its every thing I wanted, unique IU , funky looks and easy on the pocket , works good with minor lagging but that is fine as its a entry level phone. Run all the android application I have come across . I was using a Samsung S4 earlier , it used to hang too , It made me hate Samsung. Personally speaking I love this phone because its simply out of the league...Best of Windows + .Best of Asha +Best of Android. It don't feels like just another android it is strictly recommended that only those who have a flavor for new exotic things should buy it. It give you pleasure to hold it in the hand as the build is superb. You have to use it and then decide if its good or not, don't go by what people says, they always try to boycott the new and unique things.Like in case of Windows 8 and even Android if you may remember back in the day. Had bought it after a two weeks of research on it since its launch in WMC. Though it dont have a flash and a front camera, you cant aspect to get every thing in this range. The UI is futuristic,It takes time to get used to it.
first of all i have always been a nokia admirer(also htc and sony admirer), and i'm no apple or samsung fanboy... nokia x is an android phone with nokianess in it. nokia says that app developers will have to ensure that their apps do not use three Google APIs location, authentication and in-app payments and need to replace it with nokia’s APIs. So any app which uses these three APIs and not customized for the X-series will not work with all the features. PROS- good built quality. ips lcd capacitive touchscreen is good. the processor is qualcomm MSM8225 snapdragon S4 play. supports hd videos(720p) flawlessly. battery backup is good. you can move apps to external sd card. has proximity sensor and ambient light sensor as well...that's awesome. CONS- price is bit on the higher side..7.5k would have been good. the ram is quite low at 512mb...768mb was badly expected...still it depends on how the device manages ram...the same way some sony and htc devices 512mb ram manage things awesomely. adreno 203 is nothing much to boast about. nokia x gets heated quickly on slight gaming. web browsing experience is not good. fastlane ui is laggy while other launchers perform well. stock earphones are crap. regarding apps- almost 80% apps supported.50% games are supported like teplerun2,jetpack joyride,angry birds..etc.. you can sideload popular games like subway surfer..etc...the main issue is no google apps like playstore,gmail,google now,hangouts...etc and are replaced by nokia counterparts like nokia store,mix radio,music,here maos..etc...still xda devs have made google apps installation possible by rooting the device and voiding the warranty.. in a nutshell a device for nokia and android fans...
i bought this phone today on flipkart im using just 15min in internet mob is very heat what is the solouction plz ans me
this is the nokia's 1st step to android . but after i use this phone i can say nokia has more experince then other android phone brands like samsung,sony,lg..................etc with the android os........... i realy like it.....
Once I used a samsung phone long time ago, after the worst experience i moved to nokia, Lumia 920 was my last nokia phone, and this time, when i put my hands on it, Nokia, is always awesome, the words i say. People who are competing samsung, sony, with this beastie brand, Go home. The Only Brand i can trust in mobile phones, Nokia.... You can never find this interface of android in any other phone. You buy a cheap android phone and a highly priced galaxy s4, the UI is all the same...... So, think before you chose. I did, and went for it, Trust me, Its amazing, not a single bit of regret to own This phone in this price.......
I didnt bought dis phone from flipkart though i wanted to give some reviews abt dis. First of al what a phone needs is a look which is truly satisfies whoever gets it.It like having a mini iphone. Though it doesnt support google play store its has inbuilt apps like 1mobile which is far better den playstore. It has a internal storage of 4gb n also has an excellent feature of transferring the content from phone memory to memory card which bost of the samsung n other mobile lacks. Ram of 512 is far sufficient to use for dis phone. Camera quality is awesome in day light but in low light its blurry. n most important is dat the phone is nokia whch makes its special. Overal d best phone at price below 9k.
The camera is very gud !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! And it s home screen is superb a very gud Andoried phone The notification system is very gud ,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,, And gives all details of apps downloaded!!!!!!!! Nice and trendy look like Iphone ,,,,,,,,,,,,,, Very gud phone !!!!!!!!!!!!! campared with micromax ............ Gud service provider Nokia
This is a very smart adaptation of two giant brands that is windows + android and what a way to do it. I really liked it and using this phone to the fullest.
what ever nokia comes out with has to be excellent in performance and reliability. i have been using nokia e52 / e71 / e72 and e7 which have been doing great till now without any issues. the lumia hardware is excellent. and now that nokia has come out with android that has to be the best in its segment. wait for the nokia xl - it should get back nokia to the number 1 spot in cellular handsets. i have not used this handset but after going through the specifications on the website i found it to be excellent. and nokia has the best build quality and hardware always.
Nokia X, according me is the best Android phone in this price range... Nokia is giving its own custom Apps like mix radio, here maps, and it's cool design and form factor. First.... All of you who are thinking that Google Apps and services are not present so this phone is not upto the mark.... Let me tell you one thing that almost 75% of Android Apps are supported in this phone including launchers.... Nokia has provided its own app store and even some third party app stores so we don't have problems in downloading Apps.... There are thousands of Apps in the third party app stores just like the Google play, so no problem in the absence of Google play.... Second....the Here maps provided by nokia may not as excellent as google maps... But the good thing about Here maps is that it has offline map system... Which means we can use the maps and navigation without internet also.... So its a very good feature which the Google maps also doesn't have.... Guys nokia has been marketing in India for more than 30 years, so it knows its customers, it knows that most people in India still do use high speed internet hence it has introduced offline maps for our convenience.... Last but not the least.... I want to tell you one last thing.... Some of you have said earlier that multitasking is not possible on this phone because it only has one back button and no home or multitask button like in typical Android phones.and it only has 'Fast lane' which does multitasking in a way but it doesn't close the Apps like the multitasking tray of typical Android phones running ics or jelly bean ... I just wanna tell you.... Don't worry we can download an app known as MULTITASK SHORTCUT and hence by using this app we can get access to multitasking tray like in typical Android phones running ics 4 and up..... So we can do multitasking by using this app....and we can close Apps tooo.... I would personally prefer NOKIA XL to you all but you all hav to wait for some few days.... It has good camera 5mp and even secondary camera 2mp and a big 5 inch screen.... So all in all a winner.... I am gonna buy this phone only... So in my conclusion... though i have not used this product but I have done a lot of research on this product so my opinions regarding this product is genuine.... I am a huge fan of Nokia because it is the only company whose products have quality and long life.... I am currently using Moto G which is also an exceptional phone but still I am reviewing about this product of nokia.... Because nokia has our trust and belief.... I will soon buy this nokia XL because i had always wanted to buy a nokia mid range phone but luck didn't favour me... Because nokia was making only making windows phones and i liked Android.... Because of windows nokia was lagging behind and now after so many years of speculation they hav come up with a new Android phone With a cool and refreshing design and UI.... Thanks and for those of you who finds my review helpful... Do reply here in flipkart...
it is a great device for camera :its good nokia 5 mp is equivivalent to 8mp performance:fast lane is awsome ,most of games like subway surfers ,temple runs fast n zippy but struggles with graphic intensive games like asphalt and dead trigger. build quality:very premium doesnt seem budget based phones. BOSS is back,hope nokia launches more high end nokia phones.
This product is directed towards first time smartphone users to get hang of the tile based UI or metro UI. Individually the performance of apps is smooth, but multitasking cannot be done. The UI is smooth with no live tiles. The screen is responsive to touches and the build quality up to the mark. Third party app stores do make up for the loss of apps in the default store (whatsapp available in third party app store) but the hardware puts restrictions on all the games which we would want to play, but given the price tag i don't think that's a deal breaker. The battery lasts for about 10 hours (3G) with minimum music (the company provided headphones are not upto the mark) and decent amount of browsing and calls. The UI takes some time to get used to but its worth a buy for a die hard nokia fan and if you are on a tight budget.
I dont have any words left to explain NOKIA IS GREAT!!! , thanks bro "GO NOKIA X" NOKIA is here to wash out crap...
I bought this a couple of days back and here's my opinion after using it. The form factor is decent though the bezel is bulky yet sturdy enough to withstand falls. Typical Nokia. The screen is responsive. Though the RAM is only 512 the Snapdragon S4 is a processor used in high end phones a year ago and gives out a good performance with little or no lag. If you want a comparative idea how that's possible then just know that the popular IPhone 4 and 4S both have 512mb RAM but are powered by an awesome chip which gives it little or no lag. I found Nokia X to be almost similar to that. Android 4.1.1 combined with Fastlane and Nokia plus microsofts own apps are pretty decent and the run with the same quality as they do on any Andorid. This phone does not have the tight Google integration that I've come to love in a typical android phone that of searches, google experience, maps etc also Nokia couldn't do anything special to make up for that. Also those who are used to certain apps on Android that are not on Nokia's store will have to look at third party stores for downloads. Be careful while choosing third party apps as many of them could be virus and trojans. The camera is excellent for daytime shots but the missing flash may bother you. Also a missing front camera means video calls are pointless on it. Battery gives out a decent performance and lasts more than a day with decent usage. BUT HERE IS WHY NOKIA X STANDS OUT IN THE END 1) Hardware: The hardware surpasses any phone in the sub 10k range which normally run a dual-core Mediatek chip and the Nokia quality assurance means you can use this for a long time unlike Indian/Chinese brands which have a life of 1 year at maximum 2) Price: 8300 is a good buy for the features 3) Alternative. Practically non existent. Samsung doesn't match up to the quality as do any other Indian brand with the only exception of MotoG which is a powerhouse of a phone but costs 4200 more for 8gb version and doesn't have expandable memory. WHO THIS PHONE IS FOR 1) People still not switched to Smartphone looking for a quality phone 2) Existing Android users looking for a new experience In the end it boils down to the price point and Nokia quality
This is the best phone in this price range you must go for it eyes closed ... In India everybody knows that Nokia After Sales service is best Moreover it have 1 ghz dual core processor It hardly matters that ram is 512mb total ram free in the device is about 200mb my Micromax juice which have 1gb ram also gives only a 195mb ram free ..so whats the difference its camera is good than of micromax 5mp camera for this price this is a must buy ..
After a long wait my dream comes true.Nokia finally launches andriod smartphone,but as we know there are some hater who does nov want nokia progress.Today i m here to break few shitty myths about this fabulous fone.claim 1-IT is not andriod.break 1- It is andriod smartfone.it is running on andriod 4.1 jelly bean,it has all featuers of that andriod,only difference is it is not having google play,so why worries u can download 1mobilemarket,mobomarket lite,mobogenie u can download and nokia store and yandex store(quite popular in russia) is preinstalled,remember few things about google play that google play requires ID to use itso that it can steal ur personall data and eat up battery and ram a lot,does not offer pause and resume feature and inastalled app goes in fone memory so that ur fone will prone to malware and viruses,nokia store is a lot better than that,SD card app installation is supported so that u can install and uninstall 10000000 times and share ur app with anyone,anywhere,and anytime.Claim 2-UI is looking like WP.Break 2-do u know what is secret behind fast and fluidic WP,Its UI,that never hangs,Nokia is trying to make andriod hangfree which i really apperciate,but if u not like its UI,Then no problem u can use NOVA launcher,next launcher or xperia launcher and change its UI,u can get original andriod xperience and it supports multitasking,by long pressing on back key brings your home and single tap will back 1 step backword.Claim 3-Poor cam quality and processor.Break 3-Camera quality is lot better than galaxy trend and micromax 5mp,my sistes asha 311 take great pics than my galaxy y,ad processor is snapdragon 200,which is 100 times better than broadcom and shark processors.for the price it really deserve that.
First let me get some facts straigh. Firstly for all those people saying that the apps in nokia store are safer than the ones in play store, you are wrong! The apps do display ads. This is the revenue for the app developer. Secondly I see some people telling that the apps do not require any permissions to run that is not true, apps do require permissions to run. Why do you want to get this phone when you can get a full fledged android with all Google services at this price from a good brand like Samsung or Sony? There are many draw backs of this phone- it can be easily affected by malware because some of the apps must be downloaded from 3rd party app stores which cannot be trusted. In this way you are exposing your personal information to unknown parties,that is bad. The only thing that is going for this phone is it's build quality. And its oblivious that once microsoft completely takes over nokia devices section, its going to stop manufacturing such phones. This'll be like the n9 and 808 pureview. So I suggest you people to either get a lumia or a proper full fledged android.
I got my nokia x 2 days before from a local stores. I dont say this a best phone but its a great deal for 8200/-. .New and astonishing UI .Big brand for affordable price .Much better performance then compititors .Almost big games like asphalt 8, bladeslinger, dead trigger, dead trigger 2, temple run etc. run with no or negligible lag .Camera ok .Fun interface for giving up boring UI and trying something new (for kids 3+) For me no complaint deal. Enjoying the reliable brand
your site is helping people about the letest update. Launching the any stuff very quickly than others... Good..
Firstly I will give 10/10 to Nokia to accept Android Os. But when we think it without google services, we may think it's not good enough like other android devices. But as per my taste Its a great move from boring classic icon based interfaces to a metro look android device. Its a great thing. Now some points for those who interested to buy this device but little bit confused. Ok, I'm expressing something why one may opt nokia x series phone. 1. First lane (the advanced notifier) 2. OneDrive (Free cloud space to store personal data) 3. Outlook (the better mailing experience with Microsoft) 4. Less battery consume as heavy google devices outed 5. Nokia Cloud Music 6. Good Hardwares 7. A new look 8. Nokia is highly trustable 9. Nokia Extended Warranty service up to 3 years 10. Nokia exclusive apps 11. Here Navigation System 12. Supports All android apps So, One request to those, who are writing bad comments without using it, please don't do it. Just use it & then post your comments.
yup anther beauty frm nokia the X..!! reaalyy gr8 user interface wth gr8 apps !!....#in nokia #webelieve!!
According to me this Is a Superb Phone as this phone have a premium look, gorgeous theme of Lumia, And Android apps. Now what other you want in a phone at this price range.
There are lot of people who asked these questions...and before they come to judgement whether to buy it or not... Here are my honest answers. Q.Does it support multitasking? Ans. yes its supports multitasking. But it's a bit different,your tasks will be depicted in fastlane.applications will be running in background with active notifications in fastlane.your downloads will be running in background too but you cannot choose between applications Unlike other android phones. But you will love fast-lane. Q.Does it have a goggle store? Ans.. no.its doesn't have a Google store. But you have other stores. The best is 1mobile.you will find any application there including spotify.saavn; chrome, Firefox and all others...almost 70 percent applications of android are available. Q.Battery backup? Ans.. 1500 mah battery. Backup is better than lumia 520 Q.are applications hanging? Ans. no..i played temple run 2..run applications like spotify,saavn,winamp,tunewiki,realplayer,mx video player,vlc,picsart,bookmyshow,skype,tubemate and all other major applications are working fine. Q.What about Google applications? Ans.you can instal google apps like chrome,music,gmail,youtube but cannot login to your google account.but that's no big deal.for every application there is a replacement.for email you can rely on outlook..for storage rely on astromanager which will link all your account like dropbox,google drive,onedrive,for videos you will have tubemate and so on. Q.What about videos and camera? Ans. you can play HD videos. Formats like .mkv are also supported but you cannot record HD video.... only 480 p.30 fps but that too are very clear. Camera pictures are okay. And better than other 3 megapixel mobiles. Q. how different from android or windows 8? Ans. it depends on your perspective .you can change interface to android via applications like golauncher.in fact it’s better that other android of the same price because it has much better battery backup and nokia's stunning hardware. Q. what's the biggest drawback Ans. For me its mix radio.difficult to search with skip limitations and no office subscription. p.s... If you are lamenting on lower specifications of this phone then please wait for X+, XL
I am a Nokia Loyal from times of 3310. So, my connection with Nokia, like many people is emotional. And, I want to give a try to the X Series as well. But, I am really not sure that this relationship between Nokia & Android is a tight bond or something else. Does anyone here knows about the war over YouTube App for Windows between Google and Nokia (Google owns YouTube)? I don't even know who is more involved from the side of Nokia. Whether it is more of Microsoft's decision to launch X Series or it is Nokia's decision, as Nokia is not completely in control of Microsoft. This is a very doubtful case. Nokia must clarify this technical query. Or else Customers may become a part of a big conflict between the two giants. If Nokia X Series becomes successful, there is a thick chance that Google will block Nokia's path in some or the other way, as it has done in the past. There is one more question in the end, which is, Will the Phone support the advanced softwares developed by the Developers to keep up with the new versions of Android?...I have not yet seen the phone but I will give 3 Stars, only for the concept on which this phone was developed.
Any one used this model , then tell your opinions about this model has better features than crapsung guys....!
better than samsung android,,thanks to nokia fir this attempt..it is the time to swap all other mobiles..
Every think owesome in this phon... Specially Nokia Drive(work without internet) amazing camera(3mp) 510 Ram but work so smooth.Most of android app are working fine. no rear camera if want for Nokia xl.
guys,pls pls go for this product...we all know google will not provide any service in this phones..but there is no problem..microsoft is here...it supports this phone as google supports any other android phone..it is value for money..in 8.5 k we r getting qualcomm processor...512 is enough in this range for normal work...& gaming also..
Because windows mobile platform is failing and is not able to compete Android. microsoft marketing gurus had a plan, they used the android os core to gain market attention, and customized the os to look like windows(metro ui) so why such???? its just to get android users to migrate to windows easier and slowly adapt windows! so if people think android and nokia has a future they are wrong! nokia x series has no future! simply because microsoft and google are rivals. so its upon you guys to decide.. ..
To be honest, I had not expected Nokia to manage an Android release, especially after the Microsoft acquisition news broke. Nevertheless, the company persevered, and so we have Nokia X, which pairs Lumia 520-ish features with a Lumia-fied version of Android. On the face of it, the hardware specs of Nokia X are not half as bad as some people say. Samsung doesn't offer any better, nor does Sony Ericsson. You could probably get something better off Lenovo, but not much more. A Dual Core processor is decent, though as another user commented, Cortex-A5 is old, very old. RAM is decent, while camera can be compared to the Lumia 520. I can't quite understand why Nokia refused to include autofocus, which is quite a common feature amongst some less "premium" manufacturers, and would have been a great USP coming from a "premium" brand like Nokia. Now about the front camera....wait there isn't one! Oh well.... Internal storage is 4GB, which is decent for the price range, but may be on the verge of being upstaged by 8GB in the near future. Battery life is decent, as one would expect from a good company like Nokia, and I daresay finding battery replacements will be easier than for Lava or Micromax. One last hardware point - what's with the single "Look I'm an iPhone" button below the screen ? Software ? Nokia has had to cobble together its own AOSP based OS, which as usual has been given an unglamorous name (remember the Series 40 ?). Inside, you'll find the homescreen Lumia-fied, though thankfully the core has not been tinkered with. As users have commented, there is no Google Play or Google Now. A number of installation mechanisms have been devised by developers since the launch, so if you absolutely must have Google Play (yes you absolutely must), you can head over to the dev forums and download it. Apparently, the dev team behind the Nokia X is quite happy with such sideloading, but the fact remains that what doesn't come with the Google Play Out of the box, isn't a complete Android. Lastly, unlike the Lumia phones, don't expect too many updates (version updates as opposed to fixes). Nokia is likely to follow the practice of every "premium" manufacturer and treat the Nokia X like a quick-shot money spinner before letting it roam wild. So do I like the Nokia X ? Well if you'd like a souvenir from the time when Nokia had a one night stand with Android before being carried off by her new husband Microsoft, go for it. Otherwise, clap for Nokia and look for where the real meat is.
LAST BUT NOT LEAST. All features are simply super, Android apps are third which will be minus for this one but all apps support and it will easily manage to phone. i like it actually price only 8000 but flipkart giving 8500 that is not fair. jram should be 756
Good battery backup. Good camera (daylight). Nokia X operating system which has a mix of windows+Asha and supports 80% Android apps and 50% Android games. No lags while browsing or normal go through. Downloaded Asphalt airborne 1gb, temple run, candy crush, Ipl t20, chess. (all work good with no lag but asphalt lags a bit). Best part is all apps/games can be installed in memory card. What's app, Facebook, We chat, Skype, Twitter, BBM, Swift keyboard(free download), Facebook Messenger all work good. Takes 3 hours to charge, Heats up while playing games but a good start by Nokia.. I give it a 8/10 after 2days continuous usage for downloads and browse. Here maps offline is good addition (downloaded my state maps)... this price point is good google service is free but at here u get microsft service + nokia service
What is Nokia X: stolen old version of Android 4.0 (without official google play store and support from google) running on third class hardware. Past: Initially when Nokia was No-1, google went to them for android phone and Nokia head (ex Microsoft exec ) refused it. Later samsung and other chinese company made fortute selling andoid on their third class junk hardware and then Nokia wake up. Future: Once nokia is fully integrated with Microsoft, MS is going to junk this phone(as this android and android is nothing but linux which killed windows almost everywhere) and you have to send this phone to trash without any support. So, why not throw the money into trash now only... Or Buy Moto-G with excellent hardware and software.....Akal lagao.. I wish Flipkart had option of choosing -5 rating only for this item,...
hello friends, its so nice to see u here, atleat u r reviewing nokia x, thats good just go for nokia friends , they r best in mobile industry
First of all i want to say something about who are saying bad about Nokia X. -dont have google play store, camera is 3 mp, only 512 mb ram ....android without playstore no existence etc etc. i just wanna say who are saying dese are the chinese mobile promoters or who haven't used android phone, who knows 0 about android phones or they spent much amount on chinese and they feel bad for it. i will explain these BACHAS some basics of android. -dont have google play store- dont be afraid for this frnds, you can easily install google play store on your android you can download google play store apk file from google or by following links now 2nd point camera is just 3 mp. - bacho tum ab chinese chalane vale....toh soch b chinese naa rakho...its nokia 3 mp resolution with actual 3mp quality much better image than 13 mp chinese. its genuine nokia not chinese.quality speaks. now 3rd point- only 512 mb ram- the new snapdragon dual core processor performs much better with 512mb ram. you will not feel any lags like in samsung and other chinese brands. lumia 520also having 512 mb ram ....makhan jese chalta aur mere chinese bachon.....ab 8500 mein tum bache ki jaan loge kya.....abi toh bas starting hai...ekho tumhari dukan band hone ka time aagaya. lo mere chinese bachon aaj tumhe kuch naya sikhne ko mila...
first of all i jst want to say tht who dont know much abt microprocessors plzz dont jst blah blah nokia is best in quality its 2m.p can even beat crappy samsung's 5 m.p 2nd thing is tht d mega pixels doesnt hve any touch wit quality it jst increases the resolution and nt d quality of pics dont hesisate go 4 it. u wont regret.
First let me just swipe away those fools who are criticizing about nokia X. Claim 1 ) Nokia X is not pure android, Older version of android blah blah !! Wait ... did you just said that ? Do you know the difference between various android versions ? I am not talking about interface and features difference. Nokia is a 1865 based company and have years of experience manufacturing phones. So whatever they do you gotta believe in them ! Crapsung and other crap companies have flooded the market and your minds as well with typical grid type icons interface Android mobiles. Whats the deal if Nokia just modified that for a new taste ? Claim 2 ) Nokia X uses older Adreno , Qualcomm processors blah blah !! OH please, you are not a m.tech in Micro processor. Do you know the architectural difference between older and newer processor ? It may be that this version of qual comm is enough for a 512 mb memory. We cant give any judgement until we do not know about the precise architectural differences between processors. Perhaps India is a country where quantity is selected first rather than quality. Thats the biggest reason why brands such as Micromax have succeeded. People believe that higher processor frequency means higher performance !! Oh please , put on blankets and go to sleep. Claim 3) No Apps from Google Play store ! Play store has innumerable developers around the world. You cannot dislike a phone just because it dont have a play store. Here also Quality vs Quantity arises. Play store gives quantity of apps including those which access you personal data, steal your private information, access your phone services, eats your battery, and also dares to display ads on their interface when data connection is on. Claim 4 ) Poor Camera , low end features blah blah !! When Samsung, Micromax, others.. says 5MP camera, they are just joking ! When Nokia says 5MP, they actual mean it ! There is a quality in every component that nokia makes. Even the older Nokia 5230 smart phone gives superb quality videos with just 2MP camera vs the crap Samsung star pro 2MP camera. Moral : Dont look after quantity, always go for Quality.
dont compare it with any other bakwaas mobieles becz this mob. hav the capability of running those apps which samsung n sony cant think off that too without a lag
This phone is not in the mind of Microsoft it's in mind of Nokia. Now I didn't buy this. I bought Nokia asha 311. Nokia L520 ... This phone is based on Android but it's have nothing what Google provide. This means the Youtube and other apps that Google made not run on this phone. no developer love Microsoft. Microsoft never gave value to this project when they have it's own WP8.. Few years ago Microsoft release Silverlight 2 then 3 then 4 then 5. Before ending the release (last one is 5) Microsoft say we will not support silverlight anymore. One of the person I see on internet make his own silverlight book free. it's free because he working on version which is going older. Microsoft make new version one by one faster and let it die. Microsoft also burn XNA this day. He will burn normandy Os (Nokia x) one day Their is no gurantee from Microsoft how long they will support it.Better to wait and get some android at same cost. I didn't feel Nokia have anything special after sold itself to Microsoft.
nokia x is an awesome though its an android ops fone its awesome only thing is 3 mp camera it has a 512 mb I didn't buy it in flipkart (but in mobile store) no lags found like in other android fones better than Samsung or lg and other indian made fones it is the best fone
pros: nokia known for good quality nokia good customer serices better than any other companies like samsung Dual Standby SIM (GSM + GSM) 4-inch LCD Capacitive Touchscreen Nokia MixRadio - Personal Radio Station Access to Favourite Apps with Fastlane 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon S4 Dual Core Processor Android Widgets 3 MP Primary Camera cons:* No front camera * only 3MP rear cam * Dual Sim but Standby mode * No HD recording * 512MB RAM * 1500 mAh battery only *no ips screen *even nokia 520 is better than nokia x which has low price and high quality *All android apps aren't compatible with the X series, only 75% of the apps are compatible. *no google stores had own stores offers less no applications compared google stores. suggestion: 1. WAIT FOR NOKIA X+ WHICH OFFERS GOOD RAM786MB. 2.BUY SAMSUNG S2 DUOS WHICH OFFERS 786 RAM IN LOW PRICE 3 BUY MOTOG A HIT MODEL SAMSHING THE MARKET OWNED BY COMPANY GOOGLE.
Nokia re enters the market. I dont think samsung will boom now...Its finished....Lets see about the phone. Phone can run all android apps...So its great.Plus excellent grip size 4 inch. Nokia re enters the market. I dont think samsung will boom now...Its finished....Lets see about the phone. Phone can run all android apps...So its great.Plus excellent grip size 4 inch.
I was really fed up of using android phone,most of the phones and tablets are android.Customers like me became fed up of this android platform.Nokia X phone gives a refreshing feeling to the customers.If you are talking about its 3mp camera,let me tell you one thing,Its 3mp camera is equivalent to any other 8mp of any other android phone.No doubt,android phones make our life so easy.With the the use of android phone,we feel that whole world is in our pocket because we get information very easily, each and every information we have by using android phone because it has so many apps but simultaneously, it is a boring platform and so many apps create a lot of confusion.So, this phone gives a refreshing feeling,has a sturdy n cool looks with vibrant colors plus strong battery back up.It has dual sim.In windows phone , we have a single sim that's I don't want to buy windows phone.
This phone is same like Windows, i would say that windows phone would be much better than this Android phone bcoz there is no Gapps. Also the h/w is not eyecatching.
At this price point you have better options(e.g.LUMIA 520 with better hardware configuration at a lower price *cough cough*). An Android phone without Google Play Store? Oh yeah I remember it's called 'Nokia's X Platform' even though it runs forked version of Android.
* No front camera * only 3MP rear cam * Dual Sim but Standby mode * No HD recording * 512MB RAM * 1500 mAh battery only The specs at this price seems pretty low end at the price given the phone is launched in Mar 2014. Phones launched much earlier have better specs at better price. And no I am not comparing with phones from manufacturers which don't give a damn to customer service. May be 6k would have been a more acceptable price.
microsft service finally come to low end phone and also nokia here navigation + here drive free offline which missing from top high end android phone .Reason for buying is iam college student nd cant afford more money . thanks nokia now i am feeling in safe zone and safe from google service who stole my data and sale for money . plus now i all microsoft service like outlook , bing search ( becoz iam belong to good family ) one drive and skype yuppy . plus nokia service . i m ready to pay more more for both service . in future when i get job i definately buy lumia icon .
Yes,after so many years of speculation and hope Nokia has come out with an android phone But is it? Nokia X,X+ and XL run android based on androids android open source project(AOSP), and isn't vanilla android but a forked version of android. All Google services are removed from the phone,like g-mail,Google cloud,play store,Google maps are replaced by outlook,Microsoft's own cloud service,the. Nokia store and Nokia's here maps.this problem can be rectified through APK files and by rooting the phone and installing the play store(xda developers) but a lot of people don't like rooting their phones and are rather uncomfortable with the whole process It runs on a snapdragon s4 chipset,but it's the old one,the MSM8225(2012)which runs a cortex a5 processor(a5 is three years old) The phone also runs 4.1.2 ,2 years old The camera is 3 megapixels,sure, a lot of people don't care about the camera, but the size of sensor 1/5,a departure from the standard 1/4 sensor,which is even found on basic phones. 512 mb of ram is just simply not cutting edge, and even though the X+ and XL have 768 Mb of ram,the cost of both phones will be a minimum 1-3k more than the X. Even crapsung s duos 2 has 768 mb of ram, and it's 300 bucks more,has a cortex a9 processor and a video core 4 gpu which is almost equivalent to adreno 305.it also has a 5Mp camera.Only downside compared to X is the Broadcom chipset It's not even proper android,it's almost a fusion of android and windows,due to which people call it 'windroid' All android apps aren't compatible with the X series, only 75% of the apps are compatible. it isn't a major flaw,but when a cool new app comes out,it will be sad not to see it in your phone Adreno 203 is absolutely gimmicky and it's really old Some reasons to buy this phone 1) If you're sick of Samsung,go ahead,if you love Nokia,go ahead 2) it's one of the sturdiest android phones in this price range 3)Nokia after sale service is the best in the country,even better than Samsung(Samsung ASS is OK,nothing great) 4)Vibrant colors will definitely make people give a second look(not an advantage really) 5)The only snapdragon chipset android phone available by a reputed brand in the sub 10k category alternatives Galaxy s duos 2-more ram, faster processor and better gpu Xperiaa e1-snapdragon 200 processor(newer version),4.3 jellybean with a guarantied kitkat update and the best speakers in a phone you will ever find(for music geeks) If your budget can be pushed a bit higher,definitely go for moto g,cracker of a phone Also if windows is not a problem,lumina 520 is one heck of a phone which has a kraits processor unlike Nokia x and has adreno 305,and is only 7700/- Hope this review was helpful
